District of Columbia statutes.
22-1409

Use of official insignia; penalty for unauthorized use.

(a)

The Metropolitan Police Department and the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department shall have the sole and exclusive rights to have and use, in carrying out their respective missions, the official badges, patches, emblems, copyrights, descriptive or designating marks, and other official insignia displayed upon their current and future uniforms.

(b)

Any person who, for any reason, makes or attempts to make unauthorized use of, or aids or attempts to aid another person in the unauthorized use or attempted unauthorized use of the official badges, patches, emblems, copyrights, descriptive or designated marks, or other official insignia of the Metropolitan Police Department or the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 702, 49 DCR 5306
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 220, 60 DCR 2064
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 220 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.